Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. In General

§§ 41-2-101 through 41-2-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 149, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 29, § 1, related to a stream preservation feasibility study.

Section

41-2-101

was purportedly amended by Laws 1999, ch. 69, § 2, prior to its repeal by Laws 1999, ch. 149, § 1.

§ 41-2-107.
Water resources plans; review; submission to commission.

The commission shall formulate and from time to time review and revise water and related land resources plans for the state of Wyoming and for appropriate regions and river basins. The plans shall implement the policies stated in the Wyoming constitution and in statutes pertaining to the state’s water and related land resources.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 233, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.18; Laws 1977, ch. 106, § 1; 1979, ch. 59, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Idaho and Montana Procedures for Obtaining Water Use Permits — Possible Sources for Improvement of Wyoming Law,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1975).

§ 41-2-108.
Water resources plans; powers of commission.

In the formulation of these plans the commission may:

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 5.

Consult with and receive the views of persons, local groups and organizations representing water users, special interests, industries and the public interest, and acquire data and information relating to water, water use, water conservation, and water quality from government agencies, departments and other sources;

Coordinate the water resources plans with other government agencies and departments;

Undertake studies, investigations, surveys and research relevant to the formulation of the water resources plans and enter into contracts and arrangements for the same with any government agency, department, or any person, firm, university, institution, or state or national organization;

Adopt, in whole or in part, studies and reports made by other governmental agencies, state or federal; and

Perform other related activities or functions as are relevant and appropriate to the formulation of water resources plans.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 233, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.19; Laws 1979, ch. 59, §§ 2, 5.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-2-109.
Water resources plans; contents.

The water resources plans shall, to the extent deemed practical:

Identify, describe and inventory the occurrence, amounts, availability and quality of water resources, current uses of water, activities that affect the quality of water, and activities that are dependent on, affected by, or relate to water and uses of water;

Identify and describe prospective needs and demands for water and opportunities for water development, control, withdrawal, storage, conservation, supply, distribution, drainage and disposal;

Identify and specify for each plan appropriate state, regional and local goals and objectives for management of water resources, including the obtaining of economic efficiency and a desirable distribution of income, the protection of the health, safety and welfare of the people, the protection and encouragement of particular industries and activities, the protection and enhancement of the environment and recreation; and

Evaluate and compare prospective and anticipated uses and projects, including combinations and coordinations thereof, uses of alternative sources of water and alternative uses of water, in terms of goals identified pursuant to paragraph (iii) of this subsection.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 233, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.20; Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Complexities of Managing Hydrologically Connected Surface Water and Groundwater Under the Appropriation Doctrine,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 63 (1987).

§ 41-2-110.
Water resources plans; duties of commission.

The commission shall:

Publish the water resources plans as they are formulated and adopted and disseminate them to people, industries and government departments and agencies;

Give advice and assistance if requested to government departments and agencies, furnish to them the appropriate plans, and make available related subsidiary and additional data and information, or data and information related to plans in the process of preparation;

Recommend action or legislation needed to implement and carry out the plans.

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 5.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 233, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.21; Laws 1979, ch. 59, §§ 2, 5.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-2-111.
Suits for enforcement of water rights; appeals from decisions of state engineer and state board of control.

Upon the request of the state engineer, the attorney general shall bring suit in the name of the state of Wyoming, in the proper district court, to enjoin the unlawful appropriation, diversion or use of the waters of the state, or the waste or loss thereof. A showing of injury in such suits shall not be required as a condition to the issuance of any temporary restraining order, preliminary or permanent injunction. If an appeal is taken from the judgment or decree entered by the district court in such suit, it shall be the duty of the supreme court, at the request of one (1) of the parties, to advance the appeal to the head of its docket and give it precedence over all other civil causes in the hearing and determination thereof.

Upon any appeal being taken from the board of control or state engineer to a district court, it shall be the duty of the court, at the request of one (1) of the parties, to advance the appeal to the head of its trial docket and to give the appeal precedence over all civil causes in the hearing and determination thereof. If an appeal is then taken from the judgment or decree of the district court to the supreme court of the state, it shall be the duty of the supreme court, at the request of one (1) of the parties to the appeal, to advance the appeal to the head of its docket and give it precedence over all civil causes in the hearing and determination thereof.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 145, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.22.

§ 41-2-112.
Wyoming water development program.

The Wyoming water development program is established to foster, promote and encourage the optimal development of the state’s human, industrial, mineral, agricultural, water and recreational resources. The program shall provide, through the commission, procedures and policies for the planning, selection, financing, construction, acquisition and operation of projects and facilities for the conservation, storage, distribution and use of water, necessary in the public interest to develop and preserve Wyoming’s water and related land resources. The program shall encourage development of water facilities for irrigation, for reduction of flood damage, for abatement of pollution, for preservation and development of fish and wildlife resources and for protection and improvement of public lands and shall help make available the waters of this state for all beneficial uses, including but not limited to municipal, domestic, agricultural, industrial, instream flows, hydroelectric power and recreational purposes, conservation of land resources and protection of the health, safety and general welfare of the people of the state of Wyoming.

In developing financing recommendations under the Wyoming water development program, the commission shall:

Emphasize multi-purpose water projects for maximum benefits and cost allocation;

Identify project costs and benefits;

Recommend an allocation of project costs, including expenditures of state funds for Level I reconnaissance studies and Level II feasibility studies, to be reimbursed by project beneficiaries and to be borne by the state;

Recommend terms and conditions of financing project costs, maintenance and operation, based on the benefits to be derived by project beneficiaries and their respective ability to pay;

Consider all funds, assets and revenue sources of all project beneficiaries and recommend financing plans which will reimburse expenditures of state funds, except as such expenditures may be allocated to a state benefit, including enhancement of fish and wildlife habitat or recreation;

Consider state construction and ownership of any project which requires the state to finance unreimbursed costs in excess of ten percent (10%) of the total project cost, and submit recommendations on project costs and potential revenues from sale of water or power from the project;

Consider any other factors necessary to develop comprehensive financing recommendations.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 180, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.42; Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 2; 1982, ch. 59, § 1; 1988, ch. 79, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), inserted “and” following “fish and wildlife resources.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Statutory Recognition of Instream Flow Preservation: A Proposed Solution for Wyoming,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 139 (1982).

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

§ 41-2-113.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

41-1-106

through

41-1-108

and

41-2-107

through

41-2-118

:

“Project” means any dam, reservoir, canal, ditch, well or well field, hydroelectric power plant, regulatory work and all works and facilities necessary for the supply and utilization of water for beneficial uses, including the improvement of any feature, facility, function or portion of a project;

“Construct” means to construct, to acquire by legal means, to contribute or loan funds for the construction of and to finance the construction or acquisition of a project;

“Commission” means the Wyoming water development commission created by W.S.

41-2-117

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 180, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.43; Laws 1977, ch. 119, § 1; 1979, ch. 59, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§
41-2-114.
Development of water projects; rehabilitation of water projects.

The commission shall, on the basis of the state water plan or as otherwise directed by the legislature and after consultation with and advice from state agencies and officials, other appropriate agencies and officials, the cooperative tribal governing body, the business council of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe, the business council of the Northern Arapaho Tribe and members of the public, identify and select potential projects to be studied for inclusion in the Wyoming water development program pursuant to the following schedule:

Level I reconnaissance studies shall, to the extent possible:

Describe the project;

Identify the need for the project including supplies and demands for the water;

In cooperation with the state engineer, assess the status of water rights, including existing conflicts and recommendations for resolution of the conflicts and other potential obstacles;

Assess and describe federal permits required for construction;

Assess environmental considerations and constraints, including recreational use of the water in storage;

Identify legal constraints to development;

Identify alternate sources of supply including both surface water and groundwater;

Summarize public testimony received at meetings held by the commission in the basin of origin; and

Contain the commission’s recommendation to the legislature whether to terminate further consideration of the proposed project or to continue the project at its current level of study, or to proceed with further activity under paragraph (a)(ii), (iii) or (iv) of this section.

Level II feasibility studies shall to the extent possible:

Include a detailed analysis of factors relevant to development, operation and maintenance;

Identify major problems and opportunities concerning development and the environmental, recreational, social and economic effects of development;

Identify the desired sequence of events, including commencement of state and federal permitting activities and acquisition of land;

Summarize testimony received at public hearings held by the commission in the basin of origin;

Include test drilling for groundwater projects;

Contain final concept design and cost estimates;

Include the project financing plan;

Identify the interests in land and water rights to be acquired and the means and costs of acquisition. An “interest in land” may include the fee simple title or any other interest in land less than a fee simple; and

Include draft legislation describing in detail the construction, operation and financing of the proposed project, including reimbursement of predevelopment costs from the beneficiaries of the project.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 79, § 11.

Level III construction and operation plans shall proceed as authorized and approved by the legislature under the immediate direction and control of the commission. Preference in the marketing of hydroelectric power from any such project shall be given to utilities serving Wyoming municipalities and to rural electric cooperatives where economical and permissible under federal law. Pursuant to legislative authorization for water development projects and prior to completion of Level III construction the commission may:

Design, construct, acquire or purchase water development projects for the conservation, storage, distribution and use of water or any feature, facility, function or portion of a project;

Contract for the performance of any power under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, and consult with or employ experts and professional persons;

Acquire by purchase, lease, appropriation, gift, exchange or eminent domain, necessary land, easements and other property for construction, operation and maintenance of water projects and accept gifts, grants and contributions of money from any source;

Acquire by purchase, lease, appropriation, development, gift or exchange necessary water rights for construction, operation and maintenance of water projects and accept gifts, grants and contributions of money from any source;

Contract for the sale, lease or delivery of water, water rights, water storage or hydroelectric power, and fix charges, rates, rents, fees and tolls;

Contract with, contribute to or receive contributions from any legal subdivision of the state, special district, the cooperative tribal governing body, the business council of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe, the business council of the Northern Arapaho Tribe, private corporation or person for the construction, operation, management and maintenance of any project or any interest in any facility or function of a project.

After completion of Level III construction, the commission:

Shall be responsible for the operation and maintenance of state owned facilities constructed under the direction and control of the commission;

Shall manage contracts and agreements entered into by the commission pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

May contract for the sale, lease or delivery of water, water rights, water storage or hydroelectric power and fix charges, rates, rents, fees and tolls for any project constructed pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection not in conflict with contracts and agreements entered into by the commission;

May contract with, contribute to or receive contributions from any legal subdivision of the state, special district, the cooperative tribal governing body, the business council of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe, the business council of the Northern Arapaho Tribe, private corporation or person for the operation, management and maintenance of any project or any interest in any facility or function of a project.

State agencies shall cooperate fully with the commission in the preparation of the studies. In the execution of these activities, the commission shall:

Receive and acquire data relating to water, water use and water quality from any source as it relates to the project;

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 5.

Hold public hearings within the basin of origin water division where the proposed project will be wholly or partly constructed, consult with and receive the views of private persons, local groups, associations and organizations representing water users, industries and the public interest;

Coordinate the feasibility studies with the plans of other government agencies and departments;

Undertake studies, investigations, surveys and research relevant to the completion of the study and enter into contracts and arrangements for its completion with any government agency, department or any person, firm, university, institution or state or national organization;

Undertake studies, investigations, surveys and research relevant to outright purchase by the state of Wyoming of water interests from the federal government;

Perform any other related activities or functions relevant and appropriate to the completion of the feasibility study; and

Maximize the use of all existing information, data, reports and other materials, and no funds shall be expended to duplicate existing information, data, reports and other materials.

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 59, § 2.

The commission may suspend the expenditure of time or funds on a project at any level of activity, if it is established that it would be in the public interest. The commission shall report the reason for any suspension of activity to the legislature.

Any person seeking financial assistance from the water development account to rehabilitate an existing water project shall submit that request to the commission. The commission shall:

Review and develop plans and recommendations for the project as provided in this section.

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 109, § 3.

The commission shall make a recommendation to the legislature for disposition of projects it retains under subsection (e) of this section.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 180, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.44; Laws 1979, ch. 59, §§ 2, 5; 1982, ch. 59, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 122, § 1; 1986, ch. 109, §§ 1, 3; 1988, ch. 79, §§ 2, 11; 1992, ch. 42, § 3; 1998, ch. 6, § 3; 2003, ch. 78, § 1; 2005, ch. 84, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment

inserted references to the business councils of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapahoe Indian tribes in (a), (a)(iv)(F) and (a)(v)(D).

Laws 2005, ch. 84, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2006 amendment

added “and” at the end of (b)(vii); and made a stylistic and related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon all completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “Indian” preceding “Tribe” throughout (a); substituted “cooperative tribal governing body” for “joint business council of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Indian tribes” in the introductory language of (a), (a)(iv)(F), and (a)(v)(D); and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(i)(I) or (a)(ii)(I) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2005, ch. 84, § 3, provides: “The state of Wyoming recognizes members of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Indian tribes are citizens of both their tribal governments and of Wyoming, as well as several of its political subdivisions. Those citizens can best be served if the business councils of both tribes, in addition to the joint business council, are allowed to work cooperatively with the state of Wyoming and the state's political subdivisions.”

Laws 2004, ch. 34, § 10, as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 75, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.
Laws 2005, ch. 75, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2005.

Laws 2004, ch. 118, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 16, 2004.

Laws 2005, ch. 147, § 14, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Laws 2006, ch. 99, § 9, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 24, 2006.

Laws 2006, ch. 105, § 22, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming Legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 41-2-115.
Report; authorization; assignment.

In preparation of the final concept design under W.S. 41-2-114(a)(ii), the commission shall after giving public notice hold a public hearing within the affected water division. Any interested person, association or state or federal agency may appear and participate as a party. Following the hearing, the commission shall make public a report of their findings relative to whether the project is in the public interest, stipulating if the proposed project functions and services can be served by any person, association or corporation engaged in private enterprise, or if private enterprise has refused to provide the functions and services identified as being required by the proposed project. The commission shall then proceed as set forth in subsections (b) and (c) of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the duties of the state engineer or the state board of control.

The commission shall within ninety (90) days following the public hearings transmit its findings and recommendations to the governor and legislature pursuant to W.S. 41-2-114(a). Within thirty (30) days following receipt of the findings and recommendations of the commission, the governor shall submit separate recommendations concerning the projects to the legislature. If the recommendations of the governor differ from those of the commission, the governor shall state the reasons for nonconcurrence with the recommendations of the commission.

If the commission finds that a project is desirable and in the public interest, and that some other governmental agency, public district or private corporation or association is desirous and capable of constructing, operating and maintaining the project and accomplishing the public interest to be served thereby, the commission, with the approval of the governor and the legislature, shall transfer or assign the project and any property or rights connected therewith to the agency, district, corporation or association upon agreed terms for reimbursement of the expense of predevelopment costs, payment for property and assurances of construction, operation and maintenance.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 180, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.45; Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 2; 1982, ch. 59, § 1; 1988, ch. 79, § 2.

§ 41-2-116.
Water rights.

The director of the Wyoming water development office shall, at the direction of the governor, file applications in the name of the state of Wyoming for permits to appropriate water, to construct dams and other works, and to take the steps necessary to acquire, maintain or preserve the priority of any right essential to any project which is or may become a project of the Wyoming water development program, except that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize or empower the director of the Wyoming water development office to acquire water rights through the power of eminent domain.

All laws of the state relating to the appropriation and use of water shall apply to any projects of the Wyoming water development program.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 180, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-1.46; Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 2; 1986, ch. 109, § 1; 1992, ch. 42, § 3.

§ 41-2-117.
Wyoming water development commission; membership; removal; terms.

The Wyoming water development commission is created to consist of ten (10) members. The membership shall include:

Nine (9) persons, two (2) shall be residents appointed from each water division of the state as defined in W.S.

41-3-501

, at least one (1) will be a person having an adjudicated water right. One (1) resident of Wyoming shall be appointed at large and one (1) shall be an enrolled member of the Eastern Shoshone or Northern Arapaho tribes who is resident on the Wind River Indian Reservation:

They shall be appointed by the governor, after consultation with the superintendent of each water division and approval of the senate, and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

;

Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members shall be of the same political party;

Appointments are for a term of four (4) years;

Five (5) of the first appointees shall serve two (2) year terms and four (4) appointees shall serve four (4) year terms;

No person shall be appointed for more than two (2) consecutive terms;

If any member ceases to reside in or is absent from the division from which appointed for a continuous period of six (6) months or more, the governor shall declare his office vacant and shall appoint a successor from the same division for the unexpired term;

The governor shall fill a vacancy for an unexpired term in a like manner to subparagraph (F) of this paragraph;

The commission shall annually select one (1) of its members as chairman and one (1) of its members as secretary;

To serve as consultants without vote the following are designated:

The state engineer or his designee;

The chief executive officer of the Wyoming business council or other person designated by the council; and

A person with interest, training and expertise in water resource matters from the University of Wyoming or the Wyoming Water Resource Research Institute, appointed by the president of the university with the approval of the board of trustees.

Members from the four (4) water divisions, the at-large member and the tribal member shall be voting members of the commission. Six (6) members constitute a quorum for the transaction of commission business.

All grant and loan programs over which the commission has authority shall be administered by the Wyoming water development office.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 145, § 2; 1990, ch. 123, § 1; 1992, ch. 42, § 3; 1998, ch. 6, § 3; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2010 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(i)(B), substituted “seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “five (5).”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(i), substituted “Eastern” for “Arapahoe or” and “or Northern Arapaho” for “Indian.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(i)(I) or paragraph (a)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be
deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority,
board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments
in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after
the effective date of this act.”

§ 41-2-118.
Powers, duties, salaries and expenses of commission.

The commission shall:

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 42, § 4.

Have authority to contract for legal counsel upon approval of the governor to assist in matters related to water resource development as directed by the commission. By request of the commission and upon approval of the governor, the legal counsel shall be entitled to use monies appropriated for legal matters relating to water development. Legal counsel shall consult with the commission, director of the Wyoming water development office, state engineer and attorney general on a regular basis;

Submit an annual report of its activities, expenses, recommendations and other items to the governor and the joint agriculture, state and public lands and water resources interim committee by December 31;

Meet quarterly and as necessary and as the governor may direct;

Biennially on or after March 1 elect a chairman from the nine (9) persons;

Establish and adjust priorities for water development projects;

Adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of W.S.

41-1-106

through

41-1-108

and

41-2-107

through

41-2-118

, including establishment of qualifications for the administrator;

Perform other duties as directed by law;

As nearly as possible represent and assist all interests advocating water development and conservation in the state;

Have the duty and the authority to conduct studies, develop plans, and recommend legislation which may be enacted for the purpose of securing full utilization of the waters of the state of Wyoming, giving priority to projects for utilization of waters not now being beneficially used in Wyoming;

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 42, § 4.

Establish an application fee not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) which shall be paid by potential project beneficiaries prior to commission consideration of a project for inclusion in the water development program. Application fees shall be deposited into water development account I;

Represent or advocate the state’s interests in negotiations and construction of water projects assigned by the legislature or the governor;

Have authority to temporarily defer the principal amount due on debt service payments for money loaned to an irrigation district, watershed improvement district, conservation district or a conservancy district for construction of water development projects whenever the governor has declared that a drought emergency exists within the affected district’s service area. The district shall be eligible for the temporary deferral of the principal amount due, provided the interest payments on the remaining principal amount are paid and current. The commission shall amend the amortization schedule to reflect the length of time from the date the affected district seeks the temporary deferral to the date the governor declares the emergency drought condition no longer exists;

With the approval of the governor, have the authority to enter into contracts and agreements with the United States of America or its duly authorized representative agency to accept federal funds through grants or matching funds or from other sources for project costs pertaining to the utilization of Wyoming’s water resources; and

Have authority to promulgate rules to delegate administrative duties to the Wyoming water development office to facilitate the effective operation of the commission.

Commission members shall receive a salary of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) per day and actual and necessary traveling expenses while away from home while engaged in the performance of commission duties.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 1; 1982, ch. 59, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1992, ch. 42, §§ 3, 4; 1996, ch. 15, § 5; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 1998, ch. 6, § 3; 2003, ch. 158, § 1; 2004, ch. 96, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 33, § 1; 2015 ch. 167, § 1, effective March 9, 2015; 2017 ch. 34, § 1, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “Commission” for “Water division,” and “one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00).”

Laws 2004, ch. 96, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2006 amendment,

added “and” in (a)(xiii); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iii) inserted “state and” preceding “public lands and water.”

The 2015 amendment,

in (a) added (xv) and made related changes to (a)(xiii) and (xiv).

Laws 2015, ch. 167, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2015.

The 2017 amendment

, added (a)(xvi).

Laws 2017, ch. 34, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Severability. —

Laws 1979, ch. 59, § 4, reads: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming Legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 41-2-119.
Groundwater studies.

The Wyoming water development commission may grant not to exceed eight million eight hundred thousand dollars ($8,800,000.00) to incorporated cities and towns, water and sewer districts and improvement and service districts in Wyoming for exploration for and feasibility studies of the use of underground water for municipal and rural domestic purposes, not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000.00) for any one (1) exploration or study. The grants shall be made from revenues from water development account I and those revenues are hereby so appropriated. Any city or town, water and sewer district or service and improvement district receiving a grant pursuant to this section shall provide at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost of the exploration or study from its own funds. The commission shall adopt rules and regulations governing application procedures for the grants.

The commission may expend from the funds appropriated under subsection (a) of this section for exploration and for feasibility studies of the use of underground water for municipal and rural domestic purposes subject to the following conditions:

The exploration or study shall be conducted in conjunction with an incorporated city or town, water and sewer district or service and improvement district in Wyoming under an agreement;

Not more than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000.00) in state funds shall be expended for any one (1) exploration or study under this subsection;

The incorporated city or town, water and sewer district or service and improvement district shall provide at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost of the exploration or study from funds other than under this subsection;

The incorporated city or town, water and sewer district, or improvement and service district shall apply for participation in this program under procedures established by rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 8, § 1; 1984, ch. 35, § 1; 1988, ch. 79, § 2; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2000, ch. 97, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 7, § 7; 2005, ch. 75, § 2; 2008, ch. 33, § 6; 2012, ch. 57, § 7; 2019 ch. 105, § 6, effective February 26, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

in (a), substituted “five million five hundred thousand dollars ($5,500,000.00)” for “four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000.00)”; and in (b), deleted “not to exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00)” following “The commission may expend.”

Laws 2005, ch. 75, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “six million dollars ($6,000,000.00)” for “five million five hundred thousand dollars ($5,500,000.00)” in the first sentence of (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 33, § 9, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “six million eight hundred thousand dollars ($6,800,000.00)” for “six million dollars ($6,000,000.00)” in the first sentence of (a).

Laws 2012, ch. 57 § 8, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2019 amendment,

in (a), substituted "eight million eight hundred thousand dollars ($8,800,000.00)" for "six million eight hundred thousand dollars ($6,800,000.00)."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 33, § 7, provides: “The Wyoming Water Development Commission is authorized to contract with the University of Wyoming in an amount not to exceed one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($165,000.00) from water development account I to fund the Office of Water Programs established under
W.S.

41-2-125

from July 1, 2008 through June 30, 2010.”

§ 41-2-120.
Approval of loans, construction or water contracts and agreements.

All loans, construction or water contracts and agreements to which the state is a party, entered into pursuant to this act or W.S.

41-2-114

, shall be submitted to the select [water] committee for thirty (30) days for its review and recommendation and approved and executed by the governor and the head of the agency, commission or board.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 60, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to select water committee, see §

28-11-101

.